Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1253
Liquefied petroleum gas; prohibited acts; violation; penalty; enforcement.

(1) The distribution, sale, or use of refrigerants containing liquefied petroleum gas for use in mobile air conditioning systems is prohibited.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Liquefied petroleum gas means material composed predominantly of any of the following hydrocarbons or mixtures of such hydrocarbons: Propane, propylene, butanes (normal butane or isobutane), and butylenes;

(b) Mobile air conditioning system means mechanical vapor compression equipment which is used to cool the driver or passenger compartment of any motor vehicle; and

(c) Motor vehicle has the same meaning as in section 60-638.

(3) Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(4) The State Fire Marshal may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for enforcement of this section and, together with peace officers of the state and its political subdivisions, is charged with enforcement of this section.

Laws 1999, LB 163, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB37, § 1.